Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.221

Training for corrections personnel—Core training requirements.

(1) All new corrections personnel employed by the Washington state department of corrections shall, within a period to be determined by the secretary of the department of corrections, successfully complete core training requirements prescribed or obtain a waiver or extension of the core training requirements from the secretary.

(2) Within a period to be determined by the secretary of the Washington state department of corrections after completion of the core training requirements of this section, corrections personnel employed by the department shall successfully complete all remaining requirements for career level certification prescribed by the secretary applicable to their position or rank, or obtain a waiver or extension of the career level training requirements from the secretary.

(3) The secretary of the department of corrections is responsible for assuring that the training needs of the corrections personnel are met by the department's training program. Once a year, the secretary is responsible for conducting an assessment of the training programs for the corrections personnel employed by the department.

[ 2009 c 146 s 3.]